Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 72 Particular Trusts
28-72-415. Reporting and accounting by custodial trustee — Determination of liability of custodial trustee.

Upon the acceptance of custodial trust property, the custodial trustee shall provide a written statement describing the custodial trust property and shall thereafter provide a written statement of the administration of the custodial trust property (i) once each year, (ii) upon request at reasonable times by the beneficiary or the beneficiary's legal representative, (iii) upon resignation or removal of the custodial trustee, and (iv) upon termination of the custodial trust. The statements must be provided to the beneficiary or to the beneficiary's legal representative, if any. Upon termination of the beneficiary's interest, the custodial trustee shall furnish a current statement to the person to whom the custodial trust property is to be delivered.

A beneficiary, the beneficiary's legal representative, an adult member of the beneficiary's family, a person interested in the custodial trust property, or a person interested in the welfare of the beneficiary may petition the court for an accounting by the custodial trustee or the custodial trustee's legal representative.

A successor custodial trustee may petition the court for an accounting by a predecessor custodial trustee.

In an action or proceeding under this subchapter or in any other proceeding, the court may require or permit the custodial trustee or the custodial trustee's legal representative to account. The custodial trustee or the custodial trustee's legal representative may petition the court for approval of final accounts.

If a custodial trustee is removed, the court shall require an accounting and order delivery of the custodial trust property and records to the successor custodial trustee and the execution of all instruments required for transfer of the custodial trust property.

On petition of the custodial trustee or any person who could petition for an accounting, the court, after notice to interested persons, may issue instructions to the custodial trustee or review the propriety of the acts of a custodial trustee or the reasonableness of compensation determined by the custodial trustee for the services of the custodial trustee or others.

Who has received a final account or statement fully disclosing the matter unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within two (2) years after receipt of the final account or statement; or

Who has not received a final account or statement fully disclosing the matter unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within three (3) years after the termination of the custodial trust.

was an adult, now deceased, who was not incapacitated, until two (2) years after the claimant's death.

Circuit court erred in ruling that the interests of beneficiaries who predeceased the surviving settlor of an inter vivos trust lapsed upon the death of the beneficiaries; rather, the beneficiaries'descendants were entitled to the beneficiaries'shares of the trust distribution under subdivision (a)(3)(iv) of this section, which provides for a deceased beneficiary's interest in a custodial trust to pass to the beneficiary's estate, did not apply to an inter vivos trusts.Tait v. Community First Trust Co., 2012 Ark. 455, 425 S.W.3d 684 (2012).

Registration of ownership of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract with the issuer in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act”;

Delivery of a written assignment to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company whose name in the assignment is designated in substance by the words: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act”;

Irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment, pursuant to its terms, in favor of a trust company, an adult other than the donee of the power, or the donee who holds the power if the beneficiary is other than the donee, whose name in the appointment is designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act”;

Delivery of a written notification or assignment of a right to future payment under a contract to an obligor which transfers the right under the contract to a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, whose name in the notification or assignment is designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act”;

Execution, delivery, and recordation of a conveyance of an interest in real property in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act”;

Issuance of a certificate of title by an agency of a state or of the United States which evidences title to tangible personal property issued in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act”; or

Execution and delivery of an instrument of gift to a trust company or an adult other than the transferor, designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act.”

History.

Acts 1991, No. 273, § 15.

28-72-416. Limitations of action against custodial trustee.

Except as provided in subsection (c), unless previously barred by adjudication, consent, or limitation, a claim for relief against a custodial trustee for accounting or breach of duty is barred as to a beneficiary, a person to whom custodial trust property is to be paid or delivered, or the legal representative of an incapacitated or deceased beneficiary or payee:

Except as provided in subsection (c), a claim for relief to recover from a custodial trustee for fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment related to the final settlement of the custodial trust or concealment of the existence of the custodial trust, is barred unless an action or proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within five (5) years after the termination of the custodial trust.

A claim for relief is not barred by this section if the claimant:

is a minor, until the earlier of two (2) years after the claimant becomes an adult or dies;

is an incapacitated adult, until the earliest of two (2) years after (i) the appointment of a conservator, (ii) the removal of the incapacity, or (iii) the death of the claimant; or

History.

Acts 1991, No. 273, § 16.

28-72-417. Distribution on termination.

Upon termination of a custodial trust, the custodial trustee shall transfer the unexpended custodial trust property:

to the beneficiary, if not incapacitated or deceased;

to the conservator or other recipient designated by the court for an incapacitated beneficiary; or

upon the beneficiary's death, in the following order:

as last directed in a writing signed by the deceased beneficiary while not incapacitated and received by the custodial trustee during the life of the deceased beneficiary;

to the survivor of multiple beneficiaries if survivorship is provided for pursuant to §28-72-406;

as designated in the instrument creating the custodial trust; or

to the estate of the deceased beneficiary.

If, when the custodial trust would otherwise terminate, the distributee is incapacitated, the custodial trust continues for the use and benefit of the distributee as beneficiary until the incapacity is removed or the custodial trust is otherwise terminated.

Death of a beneficiary does not terminate the power of the custodial trustee to discharge obligations of the custodial trustee or beneficiary incurred before the termination of the custodial trust.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 273, § 17.

28-72-418. Methods and forms for creating custodial trusts.

If a transaction, including a declaration with respect to or a transfer of specific property, otherwise satisfies applicable law, the criteria of §28-72-402 are satisfied by:

The execution and either delivery to the custodial trustee or recording of an instrument in substantially the following form:

TRANSFER UNDER THE ARKANSAS CUSTODIAL TRUST ACT I,
(name of transferor or name and representative capacity if a fiduciary), transfer to
(name of trustee other than transferor), as custodial trustee for
(name of beneficiary) as beneficiary and
as distributee on termination of the trust in absence of direction by the beneficiary under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act, the following:
(insert a description of the custodial trust property legally sufficient to identify and transfer each item of property). Dated:
(Signature)

Click to view form.

The execution and the recording or giving notice of its execution to the beneficiary of an instrument in substantially the following form:

DECLARATION OF TRUST UNDER THE ARKANSAS CUSTODIAL TRUST ACT I,
(name of owner of property), declare that henceforth I hold as custodial trustee for
(name of beneficiary other than transferor) as beneficiary and
as distributee on termination of the trust in absence of direction by the beneficiary under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act, the following:
(insert a description of the custodial trust property legally sufficient to identify and transfer each item of property). Dated:
(Signature)

Click to view form.

Customary methods of transferring or evidencing ownership of property may be used to create a custodial trust, including any of the following:

Registration of a security in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act”;

Delivery of a certificated security, or a document necessary for the transfer of an uncertificated security, together with any necessary endorsement, to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company as custodial trustee, accompanied by an instrument in substantially the form prescribed in subsection (a)(1);

Payment of money or transfer of a security held in the name of a broker or a financial institution or its nominee to a broker or financial institution for credit to an account in the name of a trust company, an adult other than the transferor, or the transferor if the beneficiary is other than the transferor, designated in substance: “as custodial trustee for(name of beneficiary) under the Arkansas Custodial Trust Act”;

History.

Acts 1991, No. 273, § 18.

28-72-419. Applicable law.

This subchapter applies to a transfer or declaration creating a custodial trust that refers to this subchapter if, at the time of the transfer or declaration, the transferor, beneficiary, or custodial trustee is a resident of or has its principal place of business in this state or custodial trust property is located in this state. The custodial trust remains subject to this subchapter despite a later change in residence or principal place of business of the transferor, beneficiary, or custodial trustee, or removal of the custodial trust property from this state.

A transfer made pursuant to an act of another state substantially similar to this subchapter is governed by the law of that state and may be enforced in this state.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 273, § 19.

28-72-420. Uniformity of application and construction.

This subchapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this subchapter among states enacting it.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 273, § 20.

28-72-421. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Custodial Trust Act.”

History.

Acts 1991, No. 273, § 21.

28-72-422. Severability.

If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 273, § 23.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1991, No. 273, codified as §§28-72-401 —28-72-422.

Subchapter 5

— Long-Term Intergenerational Security Act of 1995

28-72-501. Short title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Long-Term Intergenerational Security Act of 1995”.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1303, § 1.

28-72-502. Legislative intent.

It is found and declared by the General Assembly that the establishment of a long-term intergenerational security trust with tax deferment provisions for an individual under eighteen (18) years of age will enable the individual's family and friends to take advantage of long-term growth opportunities and provide for the accumulation of a sizable sum of money for the individual's retirement and financial security.

It is further found and declared that individuals are living longer after retirement and their incomes do not generally grow with inflation and that the additional source of money created by a long-term intergenerational security trust will improve the quality of life of older Arkansans and possibly indirectly reduce present government expenditures.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1303, § 2.

28-72-503. Definition.

For purposes of this subchapter, “long-term intergenerational security trust” means a trust established for an individual under eighteen (18) years of age which contains the provisions prescribed in §28-72-504(a).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1303, § 3.

Cross References. Tax year — Accounting method, §26-51-401.

28-72-504. Long-term intergenerational security trust agreement.

The long-term intergenerational security trust agreement must:

Name an Arkansas resident or an entity located in Arkansas as trustee;

Provide that contributions to the trust shall not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) during any taxable year prior to the beneficiary's death;

Provide that the trustee shall not distribute any funds from the trust to the beneficiary of the trust until the beneficiary reaches fifty-five (55) years of age, at which time the trustee shall begin distributing trust funds to the beneficiary.

The funds shall not be deemed to be constructively received when the beneficiary reaches fifty-five (55) years of age; and

Require the trustee to notify the Department of Finance and Administration of all distributions of principal and interest from the trust during the previous taxable year within thirty-one (31) days immediately following the end of the taxable year.

A beneficiary must file a copy of the long-term intergenerational security trust agreement with his or her income tax return for each taxable year the beneficiary claims the tax benefits provided in this subchapter.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The Income Tax Act of 1929, referred to in this section, is codified as §§26-51-101 —26-51-107,26-51-201 —26-51-204,26-51-303,26-51-401 —26-51-406,26-51-410 —26-51-412,26-51-415 —26-51-417,26-51-423 —26-51-431,26-51-436,26-51-501,26-51-801 —26-51-804,26-51-806 —26-51-809, and26-51-811 —26-51-815.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1303, §§ 5, 6.

28-72-505. Tax and penalty on earnings.

(1)All distributions of funds from the long-term intergenerational security trust shall be taxable as provided in the Income Tax Act of 1929.

All distributions from the trust shall be deemed principal until all contributions of principal have been withdrawn.

(1)In addition to any income tax imposed for distributions from the long-term intergenerational security trust as provided in subsection (a) of this section, there is imposed a twenty percent (20%) penalty on all distributions from the trust in violation of this subchapter.

The penalty shall be collected by the Department of Finance and Administration and shall be deposited into the State Treasury as general revenue.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1303, §§ 4, 7; 1997, No. 1345, § 2.

28-72-506. When beneficiary may determine investment.

Upon reaching eighteen (18) years of age, the beneficiary of a long-term intergenerational security trust may determine, to the extent possible, the manner in which the funds are to be invested.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1303, § 9.

28-72-507. Distribution on death.

Upon the death of the beneficiary, all funds remaining in the long-term intergenerational security trust shall be distributed to the beneficiary's estate, and all undistributed income shall be included in the beneficiary's final tax return.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1303, § 8.

Subchapter 6

— Qualified Spousal Trust

28-72-601. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Property” means an interest in any type of property that is:

Held in a qualified spousal trust;

Income earned from property held in a qualified spousal trust; and

Property into which the interest, proceeds, or income earned from property held in a qualified spousal trust may be converted; and

“Qualified spousal trust” means a trust that:

At the time of its creation has two (2) settlors who are married to each other; and

Includes terms requiring that during the joint lives of the settlors, all property transferred to or held by the trustee shall be held and administered:

In one (1) trust for the benefit of both settlors and allows:

The trust to be revoked by either settlor or both settlors while either or both of the settlors are alive; and

Each settlor the right to receive distributions of income or principal, whether mandatory or within the discretion of the trustee, from the entire trust for the joint lives of the settlors and for the life of the survivor;

In two (2) separate shares of one (1) trust for the benefit of each settlor and allows:

A settlor to revoke his or her separate share of the trust without the participation or consent of the other settlor; and

Each settlor to have the right to receive distributions of income or principal, whether mandatory or within the discretion of the trustee, from the separate share of the settlor or for the life of the settlor; or

Under the terms and conditions provided under subdivisions (2)(B)(i) and (2)(B)(ii) of this section.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1047, § 1.

28-72-602. Settlement of trust.

A qualified spousal trust may include a trust term that is not inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter, including without limitation a discretionary power to distribute trust property to a person other than a settlor.

(1)Unless otherwise provided in writing by each settlor who transfers property to a qualified spousal trust, property that is held at any time in a qualified spousal trust, without regard to how the property was titled before the property was held:

Has the same immunity from the claim of a separate creditor of either settlor as if the property were held outside the qualified spousal trust by both settlors as tenants by the entirety; and

Shall be treated as tenants by entirety property for the purpose of immunity from federal and state bankruptcy laws.

Property that is held in a qualified spousal trust is not immune from the claim of a creditor if the marriage of the settlors dissolves.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1047, § 1.

28-72-603. Death of settlors.

After the death of both settlors, all property held by the trustee of the qualified spousal trust shall be distributed as directed by the then-current terms of the governing instrument of the qualified spousal trust.

After the death of the first settlor, if immediately before his or her death the predeceased settlor's interest in the qualified spousal trust was held in a separate share, the property held in the predeceased settlor's separate share may pass into an irrevocable trust for the benefit of the surviving settlor as provided by the terms of the governing instrument, including without limitation a spendthrift provision.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1047, § 1.

28-72-604. Dissolution of marriage.

For purposes of the dissolution of the marriage of the settlors, the respective property rights of settlors who are married to each other shall not be affected or changed by the transfer of the property to, or the subsequent administration of the property as an asset of, a qualified spousal trust during the marriage of the settlors unless both of the settlors expressly agree otherwise in writing.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1047, § 1.

28-72-605. Applicability of other laws.

The provisions of this subchapter are subject to the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act, § 4-59-201 et seq.

This subchapter applies to a trust that meets the description and requirements of a qualified spousal trust under this subchapter regardless of whether the trust was created before or after July 24, 2019.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 1021, § 6: Jan. 1, 2020.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1047, § 1.